Illinois, session 104th, HB3136.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-169 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-169)7    Sec. 15-169. Homestead exemption for veterans with 8disabilities and veterans of World War II.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption, limited as provided in this Section, is granted for 11property that is used as a qualified residence by a veteran 12with a disability, and beginning with taxable year 2024, an 13annual homestead exemption, limited to the amounts set forth 14in subsection (b-4), is granted for property that is used as a 15qualified residence by a veteran who was a member of the United 16States Armed Forces during World War II. Nothing in this 17Section requires the veteran with a disability or the veteran 18of World War II to have an ownership interest in the qualified 19residence if the property is owned by the veteran's immediate 20family caregiver and the immediate family caregiver resides 21with the veteran on a full-time basis. 22    (b) For taxable years prior to 2015, the amount of the 23exemption under this Section is as follows:  HB3136- 2 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1        (1) for veterans with a service-connected disability 2    of at least (i) 75% for exemptions granted in taxable 3    years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% for exemptions 4    granted in taxable year 2010 and each taxable year 5    thereafter, as certified by the United States Department 6    of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is $5,000; and7        (2) for veterans with a service-connected disability 8    of at least 50%, but less than (i) 75% for exemptions 9    granted in taxable years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% 10    for exemptions granted in taxable year 2010 and each 11    taxable year thereafter, as certified by the United States 12    Department of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is 13    $2,500.14    (b-3) For taxable years 2015 through 2022:15        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 16    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 17    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 18    annual exemption is $2,500;19        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 20    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 21    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 22    annual exemption is $5,000;23        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 24    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 25    Department of Veterans Affairs, then the property is 26    exempt from taxation under this Code; and  HB3136- 3 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1        (4) (Blank). 2    (b-3.1) For taxable year 2023 and thereafter: 3        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 4    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 5    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 6    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 7    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 8    annual exemption is $2,500; 9        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 10    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 11    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 12    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 13    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 14    annual exemption is $5,000; 15        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 16    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 17    Department of Veterans Affairs as of the date the 18    application is submitted for the exemption under this 19    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 20    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 21    exempt from taxation under this Code; and 22        (4) if the taxpayer is the surviving spouse of a 23    veteran whose death was determined to be service-connected 24    and who is certified by the United States Department of 25    Veterans Affairs as a recipient of dependency and 26    indemnity compensation under federal law as of the date   HB3136- 4 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1    the application is submitted for the exemption under this 2    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 3    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 4    also exempt from taxation under this Code. 5    This amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly shall 6not be used as the basis for any appeal filed with the chief 7county assessment officer, the board of review, the Property 8Tax Appeal Board, or the circuit court with respect to the 9scope or meaning of the exemption under this Section for a tax 10year prior to tax year 2023. 11    (b-4) For taxable years on or after 2024, if the veteran 12was a member of the United States Armed Forces during World War 13II, then the property is exempt from taxation under this Code 14regardless of the veteran's level of disability. 15    (b-5) If a homestead exemption is granted under this 16Section and the person awarded the exemption subsequently 17becomes a resident of a facility licensed under the Nursing 18Home Care Act or a facility operated by the United States 19Department of Veterans Affairs, then the exemption shall 20continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be occupied 21by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the residence 22remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person who 23qualified for the homestead exemption. 24    (c) The tax exemption under this Section carries over to 25the benefit of the veteran's surviving spouse as long as the 26spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead,   HB3136- 5 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1permanently resides thereon, and does not remarry. If the 2surviving spouse sells the property, an exemption not to 3exceed the amount granted from the most recent ad valorem tax 4roll may be transferred to his or her new residence as long as 5it is used as his or her primary residence and he or she does 6not remarry.7    As used in this subsection (c):8        (1) for taxable years prior to 2015, "surviving 9    spouse" means the surviving spouse of a veteran who 10    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 11    her death;12        (2) for taxable years 2015 through 2022, "surviving 13    spouse" means (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 14    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 15    her death and (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 16    was killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the 17    expiration of the application period in effect for the 18    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 19    sought; and20        (3) for taxable year 2023 and thereafter, "surviving 21    spouse" means: (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 22    obtained the exemption under this Section prior to his or 23    her death; (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who was 24    killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the 25    expiration of the application period in effect for the 26    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is   HB3136- 6 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1    sought; (iii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who did 2    not obtain an exemption under this Section before death, 3    but who would have qualified for the exemption under this 4    Section in the taxable year for which the exemption is 5    sought if he or she had survived, and whose surviving 6    spouse has been a resident of Illinois from the time of the 7    veteran's death through the taxable year for which the 8    exemption is sought; and (iv) the surviving spouse of a 9    veteran whose death was determined to be 10    service-connected, but who would not otherwise qualify 11    under item (i), (ii), or (iii), if the spouse (A) is 12    certified by the United States Department of Veterans 13    Affairs as a recipient of dependency and indemnity 14    compensation under federal law at any time prior to the 15    expiration of the application period in effect for the 16    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 17    sought and (B) remains eligible for that dependency and 18    indemnity compensation as of January 1 of the taxable year 19    for which the exemption is sought.20    (c-1) Beginning with taxable year 2015, nothing in this 21Section shall require the veteran to have qualified for or 22obtained the exemption before death if the veteran was killed 23in the line of duty. 24    (d) The exemption under this Section applies for taxable 25year 2007 and thereafter. A taxpayer who claims an exemption 26under Section 15-165 or 15-168 may not claim an exemption   HB3136- 7 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1under this Section.2    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (e), 3each taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under this 4Section must reapply on an annual basis, except that a veteran 5who qualifies as a result of his or her service in World War II 6need not reapply. Application must be made during the 7application period in effect for the county of his or her 8residence. The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 9determine the eligibility of residential property to receive 10the homestead exemption provided by this Section by 11application, visual inspection, questionnaire, or other 12reasonable methods. The determination must be made in 13accordance with guidelines established by the Department.14    On and after May 23, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 15102-895), if a veteran has a combined service connected 16disability rating of 100% and is deemed to be permanently and 17totally disabled, as certified by the United States Department 18of Veterans Affairs, the taxpayer who has been granted an 19exemption under this Section shall no longer be required to 20reapply for the exemption on an annual basis, and the 21exemption shall be in effect for as long as the exemption would 22otherwise be permitted under this Section. 23    (e-1) If the person qualifying for the exemption does not 24occupy the qualified residence as of January 1 of the taxable 25year, the exemption granted under this Section shall be 26prorated on a monthly basis. The prorated exemption shall   HB3136- 8 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1apply beginning with the first complete month in which the 2person occupies the qualified residence. 3    (e-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 4chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 5the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 6that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 7year, provided that: 8        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 9    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 10    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 11        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 12    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 13    as of January 1, 2019; 14        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 15    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 16    this Code; and 17        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 18    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 19    taxable years. 20    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 21service connected disability rating has changed since the 2019 22exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 23the subsequent service connected disability rating. 24    (e-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 25chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 26the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property   HB3136- 9 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 2year, if:3        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 4    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 5    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;6        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 7    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 8    as of January 1, 2020;9        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 10    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 11    this Code; and12        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 13    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 14    taxable years.15    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 16service connected disability rating has changed since the 2020 17exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 18the subsequent service connected disability rating. 19    (f) For the purposes of this Section:20    "Immediate family" means the parent, spouse, sibling, or 21child of the veteran with a disability. 22    "Immediate family caregiver" means a member of the 23veteran's immediate family who provides the veteran ongoing 24assistance with one or more of the activities of daily living. 25    "Qualified residence" means, before tax year 2023, real 26property, but less any portion of that property that is used   HB3136- 10 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1for commercial purposes, with an equalized assessed value of 2less than $250,000 that is the primary residence of a veteran 3with a disability. "Qualified residence" means, for tax year 42023 and thereafter, real property, but less any portion of 5that property that is used for commercial purposes, that is 6the primary residence of a veteran with a disability. Property 7rented for more than 6 months is presumed to be used for 8commercial purposes.9    "Service-connected disability" means an illness or injury 10(i) that was caused by or worsened by active military service, 11(ii) that is a current disability as of the date of the 12application for the exemption under this Section for the 13applicable tax year, as demonstrated by the veteran's United 14States Department of Veterans Affairs certification, and (iii) 15for which the veteran receives disability compensation. 16    For tax years 2022 and prior, "veteran" means an Illinois 17resident who has served as a member of the United States Armed 18Forces on active duty or State active duty, a member of the 19Illinois National Guard, or a member of the United States 20Reserve Forces and who has received an honorable discharge. 21For taxable years 2023 and thereafter, "veteran" means an 22Illinois resident who has served as a member of the United 23States Armed Forces on active duty or State active duty, a 24member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 25United States Reserve Forces and who has a service-connected 26disability, as certified by the United States Department of   HB3136- 11 -LRB104 11296 HLH 21382 b1Veterans Affairs, and receives disability compensation. 2(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 3103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-596, eff. 7-1-24.)